Tennessee, session 114, SB2178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-514, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(2) and substituting:
(2) When a person patronizes prostitution where the subject of the offense is:
(A) A law enforcement officer;
(B) A law enforcement officer eighteen (18) years of age or older posing
as a minor;
(C) A person who has an intellectual disability; or
(D) A person who is less than eighteen (18) years of age.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-514, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b)
(1) Patronizing prostitution under subsection (a)(1) or subdivision
(a)(2)(A) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(2) Patronizing prostitution under subdivision (a)(2)(B) or (a)(2)(C) is a
Class B felony.
(3) Patronizing prostitution under subdivision (a)(2)(D) is a Class A
felony.
(4) Patronizing prostitution within one and one-half (1.5) miles of a school
shall, in addition to any other authorized punishment, be punished by no less
SB2178
010718
- 1 -

than seven (7) days of incarceration and by a fine of not less than one thousand
dollars ($1,000).
(5) This section does not prohibit prosecution under any other applicable
law.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010718